Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Certificate of Authority

§ 17-16-1501.
Authority to transact business required.

A foreign corporation may not transact business in this state until it obtains a certificate of authority from the secretary of state.

The following activities, among others, do not constitute transacting business within the meaning of subsection (a) of this section:

Maintaining, defending or settling any proceeding;

Holding meetings of the board of directors or shareholders or carrying on other activities concerning internal corporate affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange and registration of the corporation’s own securities or maintaining trustees or depositaries with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages and security interests in real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages and security interests in property securing the debts;

Owning, without more, real or personal property;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty (30) days and that is not one in the course of repeated transactions of a like nature; or

Transacting business in interstate commerce.

The list of activities in subsection (b) of this section is not exhaustive.

A foreign corporation, foreign limited partnership or foreign limited liability company which is either an organizer, a manager or member of a company is not required to obtain a certificate of authority to undertake its duties in these capacities.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1993, ch. 196, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to continuation of foreign corporations, see § 17-16-1710.

As to licensing of foreign societies, see §

26-29-229

.

Federal copyright infringement action not barred. —

Failure to comply with the licensing and filing requirements of this section does not bar a federal copyright infringement action in federal court. Ocasek v. Hegglund, 673 F. Supp. 1084, 1987 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16115 (D. Wyo. 1987) (decided under prior law).

Word “business” includes transmission of telephone message by telephone company.

Gould Land & Cattle Co. v. Rocky Mountain Bell Tel. Co., 17 Wyo. 507, 101 P. 939,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1909).

And includes canal construction. —

Construction of a canal in the state by foreign corporation, over period of several months and involving many miscellaneous business matters transacted, was not a single transaction so as not to constitute doing business in the state. Interstate Constr. Co. v. Lakeview Canal Co., 31 Wyo. 191, 224 P. 850,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1924).

But not shipping in and installing refrigerator. —

Foreign corporation, shipping in refrigerator equipment from another state, under agreement to install same, was not doing business in state so as to preclude it from repossessing it upon default of purchaser, because it had not been domesticated at time of installation, but was engaged in interstate commerce notwithstanding the use of local labor and supplies in the installation. Creamery Package Mfg. Co. v. Cheyenne Ice Cream Co., 55 Wyo. 277, 100 P.2d 116,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1940).

Nor taking, assessing and endeavoring to sell mining claim. —

Foreign corporation which did not meet legal requirements for doing business within state but took mining claim conveyance, did assessment work thereon and endeavored to sell it, was not transacting business within prohibition in constitution and statutes. Chittim v. Belle Fourche Bentonite Products Co., 60 Wyo. 235, 149 P.2d 142,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1944).

Nor mere negotiation of sales. —

The mere negotiation of sales of goods which require transportation from outside the state constitutes interstate commerce, state statutes as to admission of foreign corporations do not apply to the acts of agents of a foreign corporation in soliciting, receiving and transmitting orders for such goods. It is immaterial whether the orders are taken by residents or nonresidents, or from consumers or dealers. True v. Hi-Plains Elevator Mach., 577 P.2d 991,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1978).

Applied

in

Waterworks Indus., Inc. v. Aplex Indus., Inc., 802 P.2d 894,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1990).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 185 (1961).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of execution of foreign corporation's contract, which, while executory, was unenforceable because of noncompliance with conditions for doing business in state, 7 ALR2d 256.

Statutory requirements respecting issuance of corporate stock on reorganization as applicable to foreign corporation, 8 ALR2d 1185.

Foreign corporation's purchase within state of goods to be shipped into other state or country as doing business within state for purposes of jurisdiction, 12 ALR2d 1439.

Foreign corporation owning or controlling stock of domestic corporation as doing business within state, 18 ALR2d 187.

Power of state to subject foreign corporation to jurisdiction of its court on sole ground that corporation committed tort within state, 25 ALR2d 1202.

What constitutes doing business within state by a foreign magazine, newspaper or other publishing corporation, for purposes other than taxation, 38 ALR2d 747.

Foreign collection or commercial agency as doing business within the state so as to be subject to statutory regulation and licensing provisions, 54 ALR2d 881.

Leasing of real estate by foreign corporation, as lessor or lessee, as doing business within state within statute prescribing conditions of right to do business, 59 ALR2d 1131.

Jurisdiction of action involving dividends of foreign corporation, 72 ALR2d 1211.

Rights of assignee or subsequent holder of negotiable paper executed to a foreign corporation doing business in state without compliance with local requirements, 80 ALR2d 465.

Holding directors', officers', stockholders' or sales meetings or conventions by foreign corporation as doing business within state, 84 ALR2d 412.

Stockholder's right to inspect books and records of foreign corporation, 19 ALR3d 869.

Validity, construction and application of statute making a foreign corporation subject to action arising out of contract made within state although such corporation is not doing business therein, 27 ALR3d 397.

Power to regulate activities of foreign corporation without state as condition of its doing business within, 35 ALR3d 349.

Foreign corporation's leasing of personal property as doing business within statutes prescribing conditions of right to do business, 50 ALR3d 1020.

§ 17-16-1502.
Consequences of transacting business without authority.

A foreign corporation transacting business in this state without a certificate of authority may not maintain a proceeding in any court in this state until it obtains a certificate of authority.

The successor to a foreign corporation that transacted business in this state without a certificate of authority and the assignee of a cause of action arising out of that business may not maintain a proceeding based on that cause of action in any court in this state until the foreign corporation or its successor obtains a certificate of authority.

A court may stay a proceeding commenced by a foreign corporation, its successor or assignee until it determines whether the foreign corporation or its successor requires a certificate of authority. If it so determines, the court may further stay the proceeding until the foreign corporation or its successor obtains the certificate.

A foreign corporation which transacts business in this state without a certificate of authority shall be liable to this state, for the years or parts thereof during which it transacted business in this state without a certificate of authority, in an amount equal to all fees and license taxes, plus interest of eighteen percent (18%), which would have been imposed by law upon such corporation had it duly applied for and received a certificate of authority to transact business in this state as required by this act and thereafter filed all reports required by law, and in addition shall be liable for a penalty in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), reasonable audit expenses and reasonable attorney fees. The secretary of state may refuse to issue a certificate of authority until all taxes, fees, interest, expenses and penalties due under this section have been paid to him. The attorney general may collect all penalties and other sums due under this subsection.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the failure of a foreign corporation to obtain a certificate of authority does not impair the validity of its corporate acts or prevent it from defending any proceeding in this state.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2000, ch. 35, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

made a grammatical change in (c).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Determination of “transacting business” lies in nature of activities. —

Section

17-16-1501

and this section prohibit an unqualified foreign corporation from transacting business in this state. While there may be some difference of opinion as to whether “to transact business” is distinctive from “doing business,” in any event, the determination of the issue lies not on the quantum but rather on the quality and nature of the corporation's activities. True v. Hi-Plains Elevator Mach., 577 P.2d 991,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1978) (decided under prior law).

Section bars prosecution of action without compliance. —

The provision of this section is mandatory, so that an action cannot be prosecuted where noncompliance with the provision hereof is raised. Gould Land & Cattle Co. v. Rocky Mountain Bell Tel. Co., 17 Wyo. 507, 101 P. 939,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1909).

But state courts cannot bar enforcement of interstate contract. —

State cannot deny a forum to corporate claimants who seek to enforce obligations arising under a contract which involves an interstate transaction. Booth v. Magee Carpet Co., 548 P.2d 1252,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1976).

And federal courts may enforce contracts without compliance. —

Since constitutional and statutory provisions prohibiting foreign corporations from doing business in state without first complying with their requirements do not void contracts made in state without such compliance, though state courts may refuse to enforce them, that fact will not prevent enforcement in federal courts. Louis Ilfeld Co. v. Union P. R. Co., 23 F.2d 65, 1927 U.S. App. LEXIS 3137 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1927), cert. denied, 276 U.S. 635, 48 S. Ct. 420, 72 L. Ed. 743, 1928 U.S. LEXIS 250 (U.S. 1928).

Provisions applicable to counterclaims. —

The phrase “any action, suit or proceeding” in subsection (a) applies to a counterclaim. A counterclaim, inasmuch as it asks for affirmative relief, assumes the same status of an original complaint. True v. Hi-Plains Elevator Mach., 577 P.2d 991,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1978) (decided under prior law).

Noncomplying corporation not under bar when ceases business in state. —

Where statutes do not render contracts of a noncomplying corporation void, a foreign corporation, when it ceases to do business in the state, is no longer under the bar of the statute. Its violation of the law having ceased, it has the same rights as a litigant as any other foreign corporation which is not attempting to carry on its business in the state and may sue on contracts which it has made in the state without complying with the statutes. True v. Hi-Plains Elevator Mach., 577 P.2d 991,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1978).

Domestication after first but before second suit suffices. —

Fact that foreign corporation domesticated itself after having commenced and dismissed action is not of importance to preclude recovery, in a second suit, especially concerning an interstate transaction. Creamery Package Mfg. Co. v. Cheyenne Ice Cream Co., 55 Wyo. 277, 100 P.2d 116,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1940).

Cited

in

Waterworks Indus., Inc. v. Aplex Indus., Inc., 802 P.2d 894,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of statute denying access to courts because of foreign corporation's failing to comply with regulatory scheme when corporation complies after commencement of the action, 6 ALR3d 326.

Foreign corporation's access to courts, 90 ALR3d 937.

What constitutes doing business within state for purposes of state “closed-door” statute barring unqualified or unregistered foreign corporation from local courts—modern cases, 88 ALR4th 466.

Application of statute denying access to courts or invalidating contracts where corporation fails to comply with regulatory statute as affected by compliance after commencement of action, 23 ALR5th 744.

§ 17-16-1503.
Application for certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation may apply for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing. The application shall set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation or, if its name is unavailable for use in this state, a corporate name that satisfies the requirements of W.S.

17-16-1506

;

The name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

Its date of incorporation and period of duration;

The street address of its principal office and an email address for the foreign corporation;

The address of its registered office in this state and the name of its registered agent at that office;

The names and usual business addresses of its current directors and officers; and

Repealed By Laws 2009, Ch. 115, § 3.

A statement that the corporation accepts the constitution of the state of Wyoming in compliance with the requirement of article 10, section 5 of the Wyoming constitution.

Repealed By Laws 2009, Ch. 115, § 3.

The foreign corporation shall deliver with the completed application a certificate of existence, or a document of similar import, dated not more than sixty (60) days prior to filing in Wyoming, duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law it is incorporated.

The application for certificate of authority shall be accompanied by a written consent to appointment executed by the registered agent.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to foreign insurer's certificate of authority, see §

26-3-112

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed (a)(vii) and (ix), which read: “(vii)
An estimate, expressed in dollars, of the value of the property of the corporation located and employed in the state of Wyoming

“(ix)
Such additional information as may be necessary or appropriate in order to enable the secretary of state to determine whether such corporation is entitled to a certificate of authority to transact business in this state and to determine and assess the fees and license taxes under the laws of this state.”; and made related changes.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "and an email address for the foreign corporation" at the end of (a)(iv).

Section inapplicable to national bank. —

A national bank, being a corporation organized under laws of the United States, is not required to file acceptance of the constitution before transacting business in this state, although its principal place of business may be located in another state. State ex rel. Eaton v. Hirst, 53 Wyo. 163, 79 P.2d 489,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1938).

§ 17-16-1504.
Amended certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall obtain an amended certificate of authority from the secretary of state if it changes:

Its corporate name;

The period of its duration; or

The state or country of its incorporation.

The requirements of W.S.

17-16-1503

for obtaining an original certificate of authority apply to obtaining an amended certificate under this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

§ 17-16-1505.
Effect on certificate of authority.

A certificate of authority authorizes the foreign corporation to which it is issued to transact business in this state subject, however, to the right of the state to revoke the certificate as provided in this act.

A foreign corporation with a valid certificate of authority has the same but no greater rights and has the same but no greater privileges as, and except as otherwise provided by this act is subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties and liabilities now or later imposed on, a domestic corporation of like character.

This act does not authorize this state to regulate the organization or internal affairs of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Corporate Expression in Wyoming Ballot Issues, Referenda and Initiatives: A Political and Legal Dilemma,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 449 (1979).

§ 17-16-1506.
Corporate name of foreign corporation.

If the corporate name of a foreign corporation does not satisfy the requirements of W.S.

17-16-401

, the foreign corporation to obtain or maintain a certificate of authority to transact business in this state may use a fictitious name to transact business in this state if its real name is unavailable and it delivers to the secretary of state for filing a copy of the resolution of its board of directors, certified by its secretary, adopting the fictitious name.

Except as authorized by subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the corporate name, including a fictitious name, of a foreign corporation shall not be the same as, or deceptively similar to the name of any trademark or service mark registered in this state and shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from other business names as required by W.S.

17-16-401

.

A foreign corporation may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use in this state the name of another corporation, incorporated or authorized to do business in this state, that is not distinguishable in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 17-16-401(c).

Reserved;

Reserved.

A foreign corporation may use in this state the name, including the fictitious name, of another domestic or foreign corporation that is used in this state if the other corporation is incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state and the foreign corporation has:

Merged with the other corporation; or

Been formed by reorganization of the other corporation; or

Acquired all or substantially all of the assets, including the corporate name, of the other corporation; or

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 80, § 3.

Has received the written consent of the other corporation, which written consent also sets forth a description of a proposed merger, consolidation, dissolution, amendment to articles of incorporation or other intended corporate action which establishes to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that the coexistence of two (2) corporations using the same name will not continue for more than one hundred twenty (120) days.

If a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state changes its corporate name to one that does not satisfy the requirements of W.S.

17-16-401

, it may not transact business in this state under the changed name until it adopts a name satisfying the requirements of W.S.

17-16-401

and obtains an amended certificate of authority under W.S.

17-16-1504

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1996, ch. 80, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to reservation of right to use name, see §

17-16-402

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “in this state the name of another corporation, incorporated or authorized to do business in this state” for “a name” in (c); added (d)(v); and made related changes.

§ 17-16-1507.
Registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation.

Each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

; and

A registered agent as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

.

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 3.

The provisions of W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

shall apply to all foreign corporations.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, §§ 2, 3.

The 2008 amendment,

effective January 1, 2009, amends this section, effective January 1, 2009, by rewriting (a)(i) and (a)(ii), in part by repealing (a)(ii)(A) through (C), relating to registered agents; and inserting (b).

Editor's notes. —

The provisions in this section do not align directly with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, or contain provisions not included in the Model Act.

§§ 17-16-1508 through 17-16-1510.
[Reserved.]

§ 17-16-1511.
Merger of foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.

Whenever a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall be a party to a statutory merger permitted by the laws of the state or country of incorporation, it shall, within thirty (30) days after a merger becomes effective, file with the secretary of state a current certificate of evidence issued by the proper officer of the state or country of incorporation which sets forth:

The date of filing;

The names of each corporation involved and the states of incorporation; and

The name of the surviving corporation.

It shall not be necessary for the corporation to procure either a new or amended certificate of authority to transact business in this state unless the name of the corporation is changed by merger or unless the corporation desires to pursue in this state other or additional purposes than those which it is then authorized to transact in this state.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

The provisions in this section do not align directly with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, or contain provisions not included in the Model Act.